Hawaii statutes.
[§128E-4] Establishment of emergency
planning districts. Each county is designated as an emergency planning
district for the purposes of this chapter; provided that the department shall
be responsible for Kalawao county. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next